Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-709.01
Judicial retirement proceedings before Commission on Judicial Qualifications; confidential.

All documents filed with and proceedings before the Commission on Judicial Qualifications pursuant to sections 24-709 and 24-712 shall be confidential.

Laws 1981, LB 475, § 12;

Laws 2000, LB 1192, § 8.